District of Columbia statutes.
32-1457

Applicability.

This chapter shall not apply to an employment contract entered into before March 11, 2015; provided, that upon renewal of such a contract, this chapter shall apply.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-219, § 8, 62 DCR 9